fi: Satiininauhan pinnan tyyppi: Kaksipuolinen satiini; Yksipuolinen satiini; Muu
da: Satinbånds overfladetype: Dobbeltsidet satin; Enkeltsidet satin; Andet
es: Tipo de cara de cinta satinada: Satén de doble cara; Satén de una cara; Otro
ko: 새틴 리본 면 유형: 양면 새틴; 단면 새틴; 기타
bg-BG: Тип лице на сатенената панделка: Двулицев сатен; Еднолицев сатен; Друго
de: Satinausführung des Bands: Doppelseitiger Satin; Einseitiger Satin; Sonstige
ru: Тип стороны атласной ленты: Двусторонняя атласная; Односторонняя атласная; Другой
sl-SI: Vrsta čelne strani satenastega traku: Obojestranski saten; Enostranski saten; Drugo
th: ชนิดของริบบิ้นผ้าซาติน: ซาตินหน้าคู่; ซาตินหน้าเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
tr: Saten kurdele yüzey tipi: Çift taraflı saten; Tek taraflı saten; Diğer
lt-LT: Satino juostelės paviršiaus tipas: Dvipusis satinas; Vienpusis satinas; Kita
cs: Typ obličeje se saténovou stuhou: Oboustranný satén; Jednostranný satén; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de față a panglicii de satin: Satin cu două fețe; Satin cu o față; Altele
zh-TW: 緞面緞帶正面類型: 雙面緞; 單面緞; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fita de cetim: Cetim de dupla face; Cetim de face simples; Outro
nl: Satijnlint voorzijde type: Dubbelzijdig satijn; Enkelzijdig satijn; Overige
fr: Type de face du ruban de satin: Satin double face; Satin simple face; Autre
pl: Typ strony wstążki satynowej: Satyna dwustronna; Satyna jednostronna; Inny
zh-CN: 缎带光泽面类型: 双面缎带; 单面缎带; 其他
vi: Kiểu mặt ruy băng satin: Satin hai mặt; Satin một mặt; Khác
ja: サテンリボン表面タイプ: ダブルフェイスサテン; シングルフェイスサテン; その他
sv: Satinband – sidotyp: Dubbelsidig satin; Enkelsidig satin; Övrigt
it: Tipo di finitura del nastro di raso: Raso a doppia faccia; Raso a singola faccia; Altro
el: Τύπος όψης σατέν κορδέλας: Σατέν διπλής όψης; Σατέν μονής όψης; Άλλο
nb: Ansiktstype for satengbånd: Tosidig sateng; Ensidig sateng; Annet
hr-HR: Tip lica sa satenskom vrpcom: Obostrani saten; Jednostrani saten; Ostalo
hu: Szaténszalag oldalfelületének típusa: Kétoldalas szatén; Egyoldalas szatén; Egyéb
en: Satin ribbon face type: Double-face satin; Single-face satin; Other
sk-SK: Typ povrchu saténovej stuhy: Obojstranný satén; Jednostranný satén; Iné
pt-BR: Fita de cetim tipo de face: Cetim dupla face; Cetim face simples; Outros